Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.060

Record of warrants.

The auditor shall maintain a record of when a warrant is issued. The record shall include the warrant number, date, name of payee, amount, nature of claims, or services provided.

[ 1995 c 194 s 3; 1963 c 4 s 36.22.060. Prior: 1893 c 119 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 2710, part; 1869 p 310 s 5, part; 1863 p 549 s 5, part; 1854 p 425 s 5, part; RRS s 4086, part.]